Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 3. Background Checks.

§ 63.2-1719.
Barrier crime; construction.

For purposes of this chapter, in the case of child welfare agencies and foster and adoptive homes approved by child-placing agencies, convictions for any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

shall include prior adult convictions and juvenile convictions or adjudications of delinquency based on a crime that would be a felony if committed by an adult within or outside the Commonwealth.

History.

1985, c. 360, § 63.1-198.1; 1986, cc. 300, 627; 1987, cc. 130, 131, 692, 693; 1992, c. 746; 1993, cc. 730, 742; 1996, c. 747; 1998, cc. 551, 581; 1999, c. 740; 2001, c. 778; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 467; 2012, c. 383; 2016, c. 580; 2017, c. 809.

Cross references.

As to voluntary registration of family day care home serving fewer than six children, see §

63.2-1704

A.

As to regulation of child-care services and facilities in certain counties and cities, see §

15.2-914

. As to dissemination of criminal history record information, see §

19.2-389

. As to national criminal background checks by businesses and organizations regarding employees or volunteers providing care to children, the elderly and disabled, see §

19.2-392.02

. As to certain private school employees subject to fingerprinting and criminal records checks, see § 22.1-296.3.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 357 G, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “No child day center, family day home, or family day system licensed in accordance with Chapter 17, Title 63.2; child day center exempt from licensure pursuant to §

63.2-1716

; registered family day home; family day home approved by a family day system; or any child day center or family day home that enters into a contract with the Department of Social Services or a local department of social services to provide child care services funded by the Child Care and Development Block Grant shall employ; continue to employ; or permit to serve as a volunteer who will be alone with, in control of, or supervising children any person who has an offense as defined in §

63.2-1719

. All employees and volunteers shall undergo the following background check by July 1, 2017 and every 5 years thereafter, as required by the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 2014 (CCDBG).”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 467, in the definition of “Barrier crime,” substituted “assaults” for “assault” following “§

18.2-48

,” and “threats of death or bodily injury as set out in §

18.2-60

” for “extortion by threat as set out in §

18.2-59

.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 383, in the definition of “Barrier crime,” in the first sentence, inserted “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in § 16.1-253.2,” “or B” preceding “of §

18.2-47

,” “extortion by threat as set out in §

18.2-59

,” and “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in §

18.2-60.4

.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 580, in the definition for “Offense,” inserted present clause (i) and redesignated subsequent clauses accordingly, and inserted “or described in clause (i)” in clause (ii).

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809 rewrote the section, which formerly listed specific offenses.

§ 63.2-1720.
Assisted living facilities, adult day care centers; employment for compensation of persons or use of volunteers convicted of certain offenses prohibited; background check required; penalty.

No assisted living facility or adult day care center shall hire for compensated employment or continue to employ persons who have been convicted of any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

. A child-placing agency or independent foster home licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall not hire for compensated employment or continue to employ persons who (i) have been convicted of any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) are the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth. All applicants for employment shall undergo background checks pursuant to subsection C.

A licensed assisted living facility or adult day care center may hire an applicant or continue to employ a person convicted of one misdemeanor barrier crime not involving abuse or neglect, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if five years have elapsed following the conviction.

Background checks pursuant to subsection A require:

A sworn statement or affirmation disclosing whether the person has a criminal conviction or is the subject of any pending criminal charges within or outside the Commonwealth and, in the case of licensed child-placing agencies or independent foster homes, whether or not the person has been the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth;

A criminal history records check through the Central Criminal Records Exchange pursuant to §

19.2-389

; and

In the case of licensed child-placing agencies or independent foster homes, a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse and neglect.

Any person making a materially false statement regarding the sworn statement or affirmation provided pursuant to subdivision C 1 is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

A licensed assisted living facility, licensed adult day care center, licensed child-placing agency, or licensed independent foster home shall obtain for any compensated employees within 30 days of employment (i) an original criminal record clearance with respect to convictions for any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or an original criminal history record from the Central Criminal Records Exchange and (ii) in the case of licensed child-placing agencies or independent foster homes, (a) an original criminal record clearance with respect to any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or an original criminal history record from the Central Criminal Records Exchange and (b) a copy of the information from the central registry for any compensated employee within 30 days of employment. However, no employee shall be permitted to work in a position that involves direct contact with a person or child receiving services until an original criminal record clearance or original criminal history record has been received, unless such person works under the direct supervision of another employee for whom a background check has been completed in accordance with the requirements of this section. If an applicant is denied employment because of information from the central registry or convictions appearing on his criminal history record, the licensed assisted living facility, adult day care center, child-placing agency, or independent foster home shall provide a copy of the information obtained from the central registry or the Central Criminal Records Exchange or both to the applicant.

No volunteer who (i) has been convicted of any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) is the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth shall be permitted to serve in a licensed child-placing agency or independent foster home. Any person desiring to volunteer at a licensed child-placing agency or independent foster home shall provide the agency, system, or home with a sworn statement or affirmation pursuant to subdivision C 1. Such licensed child-placing agency or independent foster home shall obtain for any volunteers, within 30 days of commencement of volunteer service, a copy of (a) the information from the central registry and (b) an original criminal record clearance with respect to any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or an original criminal history record from the Central Criminal Records Exchange. Any person making a materially false statement regarding the sworn statement or affirmation provided pursuant to subdivision C 1 is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. If a volunteer is denied service because of information from the central registry or convictions appearing on his criminal history record, such licensed child-placing agency or independent foster home shall provide a copy of the information obtained from the central registry or the Central Criminal Records Exchange or both to the volunteer. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to volunteers who will be alone with any child in the performance of their duties and shall not apply to a parent-volunteer of a child attending a licensed child-placing agency or independent foster home, whether or not such parent-volunteer will be alone with any child in the performance of his duties. A parent-volunteer is someone supervising, without pay, a group of children that includes the parent-volunteer’s own child in a program that operates no more than four hours per day, provided that the parent-volunteer works under the direct supervision of a person who has received a clearance pursuant to this section.

No volunteer shall be permitted to serve in a licensed assisted living facility or licensed adult day care center without the permission or under the supervision of a person who has received a clearance pursuant to this section.

Further dissemination of the background check information is prohibited other than to the Commissioner’s representative or a federal or state authority or court as may be required to comply with an express requirement of law for such further dissemination.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensed adult day care center that provides services to individuals receiving services under the state plan for medical assistance services or any waiver thereto may disclose to the Department of Medical Assistance Services (i) whether a criminal history background check has been completed for an employee in accordance with this section and (ii) whether such employee is eligible for employment.

A licensed assisted living facility shall notify and provide all students a copy of the provisions of this article prior to or upon enrollment in a certified nurse aide program operated by such assisted living facility.

A person who complies in good faith with the provisions of this section shall not be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission in the performance of duties under this section unless the act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

1985, c. 360, § 63.1-198.1; 1986, cc. 300, 627; 1987, cc. 130, 131, 692, 693; 1992, cc. 746, 844, §§ 63.1-173.2, 63.1-194.13; 1993, cc. 17, 657, 730, 742, 957, 993; 1996, c. 747; 1998, cc. 551, 581; 1999, cc. 637, 740; 2001, c. 778; 2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 723; 2006, cc. 701, 764; 2014, c. 129; 2015, cc. 758, 770; 2016, c. 632; 2017, cc. 189, 201, 751, 809; 2019, c. 89; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Cross references.

As to records check for employees or volunteers of a child day center or family day home that has not met the requirements of §§

63.2-1720

,

63.2-1721

, and

63.2-1724

and that applies to enter into a contract with a local department of social services, see § 63.2-1725.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 744, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act for the period of July 1, 2006, through July 30, 2008, and passed during the 2007 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor. If such funds are appropriated, then the provisions of this act shall become affective July 1, 2007. ” The funding was not provided and the amendments to this section by Acts 2006, c. 744, never took effect.

Acts 2015, cc. 758 and 770, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of §§

63.2-1720

and

63.2-1721

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and of §§

63.2-1720.1

and

63.2-1721.1

, as created by this act, shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278, provided for a July 1, 2020, expiration date for the 2017 amendments. Acts 2020, cc. 462 and 463, cl. 1 and 2, repealed Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278.

Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278, provided for expiration of the 2017 amendments upon repeal of certain provisions of the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 2014 establishing requirements for national fingerprint-based criminal history background checks for employees and applicants. Acts 2020, cc. 462 and 463, cl. 1 and 2, repealed Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 723 substituted “D” for “C” in subsections A, E, and G; inserted present subsection C and redesignated former subsections C through K as subsections D through L; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 701 and 764 are identical, and substituted “if” for “or moral turpitude, provided” in subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 129, added the second sentence in subsection F.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 758 and 770 are identical, effective July 1, 2017, and rewrote the section.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 632 inserted “or continue to employ” in the first sentence in subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 189 and 751 are identical, and deleted “family day systems, registered family day homes, and family day homes approved by family day systems” or similar language following “independent foster home” throughout the section, and made related changes. For expiration and contingent repeal dates, see Editor’s notes.

The 2017 amendment by c. 201 inserted “or continue to employ a person” in subsection B.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809, rewrote subsection A; in subsection B, inserted “or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction”; in subsection E, substituted “any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

” for “offenses specified in §

63.2-1719

” and inserted clause (a); in subsection F, rewrote clause (i), which read “has an offense as defined in §

63.2-1719

” and added clause (ii) and in clause (b) substituted “any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

” for “offenses specified in § 63.2-1719”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 89 added subsection I and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, both effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subdivisions C 1 and C3, deleted “and family day systems, registered family day homes, and family day homes approved by family day systems” following “independent foster homes” once in each subdivision; in subsection E, first sentence, deleted “licensed family day system, registered family day home, or family day home approved by a family day system” following “independent foster home” in the introductory wording and deleted “and family day systems, registered family day homes, and family day homes approved by family day systems” following “independent foster homes” in clause (ii), and in the last sentence, deleted “or family day system, registered family day home, or family day home approved by a family day system” following “independent foster home”; in subsection F, deleted “or family day system, registered family day home, or family day home approved by a family day system” following “independent foster home” five times wherever the language appeared and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

The phrase “while employed in a child day center”

refers to an offense committed during the period of time an individual is employed at a child day center, regardless of whether or not the offense was committed within the scope of employment there. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable T. Scott Garrett, M.D., Member, House of Delegates, No. 15-003,
(7/31/15).

§ 63.2-1720.1.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to Licensed child day centers, family day homes, and family day systems; employment for compensation or use as volunteers of persons convicted of or found to have committed certain offenses prohibited; national background check required; penalty, see § 22.1-289.035.

Editor’s note.

Former

63.2-1720.1

, pertaining to licensed child day centers and licensed family day homes; employment for compensation or use as volunteers of persons convicted of or found to have committed certain offenses prohibited; national background check required; penalty, derived from
2015, cc. 758,
770;
2016, c. 632;
2017, cc. 189,
751,
809;
2019, c. 447;
2020, c. 936.

Acts
2020, cc. 860 and
861, effective July 1, 2021, repealed various sections in this chapter and recodified them. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendments by Acts
2020, c. 936 have also been given effect in
§ 22.1-289.035, effective July 1, 2021.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 251, cl. 2 and 510, cl. 3 provide: “That the provisions of
§§

19.2-389

, as it is currently effective,

63.2-1720.1

, and

63.2-1724

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, (i) shall not become effective unless the provisions of Chapter 14.1 ( § 22.1-289.02 et seq.) of Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia, except for
§ 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, become effective on a date subsequent to July 1, 2021, and (ii) shall expire upon the effective date of such provisions of Chapter 14.1 of Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia.” The amendments by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 251 and
510, to this section never took effect.

§ 63.2-1721.
Background check upon application for licensure as a child-placing agency, etc.; penalty.

Upon application for licensure as a child-placing agency or independent foster home, (i) all applicants and (ii) agents at the time of application who are or will be involved in the day-to-day operations of the child-placing agency or independent foster home or who are or will be alone with, in control of, or supervising one or more of the children shall undergo a background check pursuant to subsection B. Upon application for licensure as an assisted living facility, all applicants shall undergo a background check pursuant to subsection B. In addition, foster or adoptive parents requesting approval by child-placing agencies shall undergo background checks pursuant to subsection B prior to their approval.

Background checks pursuant to subsection A require:

A sworn statement or affirmation disclosing whether the person has a criminal conviction or is the subject of any pending criminal charges within or outside the Commonwealth and whether or not the person has been the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth;

A criminal history records check through the Central Criminal Records Exchange pursuant to §

19.2-389

; and

In the case of child-placing agencies, independent foster homes, or adoptive or foster parents, a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse and neglect.

The person required to have a background check pursuant to subsection A shall submit the background check information required in subsection B to the Commissioner’s representative prior to issuance of a license, registration or approval. The applicant, other than an applicant for licensure as an assisted living facility, shall provide an original criminal record clearance with respect to any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or an original criminal history record from the Central Criminal Records Exchange. An applicant for licensure as an assisted living facility shall provide an original criminal record clearance with respect to any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or an original criminal history record from the Central Criminal Records Exchange. Any person making a materially false statement regarding the sworn statement or affirmation provided pursuant to subdivision B 1 is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. If any person specified in subsection A, other than an applicant for licensure as an assisted living facility, required to have a background check (i) has been convicted of any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) is the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth, and such person has not been granted a waiver by the Commissioner pursuant to §

63.2-1723

or is not subject to an exception in subsection E, F, G, or H, (a) the Commissioner shall not issue a license to a child-placing agency or independent foster home or (b) a child-placing agency shall not approve an adoptive or foster home. If any applicant for licensure as an assisted living facility required to have a background check has been convicted of any offense set forth in clause (i) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

, the Commissioner shall not issue a license to an assisted living facility.

No person specified in subsection A shall be involved in the day-to-day operations of a licensed child-placing agency or independent foster home; be alone with, in control of, or supervising one or more children receiving services from a licensed child-placing agency or independent foster home; or be permitted to work in a position that involves direct contact with a person receiving services without first having completed background checks pursuant to subsection B unless such person is directly supervised by another person for whom a background check has been completed in accordance with the requirements of this section.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in this section, a child-placing agency may approve as an adoptive or foster parent an applicant who has been convicted of not more than one misdemeanor offense as set out in §

18.2-57

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, not involving abuse, neglect, moral turpitude, or a minor, provided that 10 years have elapsed following the conviction.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in this section, a child-placing agency may approve as a foster parent an applicant who has been convicted of statutory burglary for breaking and entering a dwelling home or other structure with intent to commit larceny, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, who has had his civil rights restored by the Governor or other appropriate authority, provided that 25 years have elapsed following the conviction.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in this section, a child-placing agency may approve as an adoptive or foster parent an applicant convicted of any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

who has had his civil rights restored by the Governor or other appropriate authority, provided that 10 years have elapsed following the conviction, or eight years have elapsed following the conviction and the applicant (i) has complied with all obligations imposed by the criminal court; (ii) has completed a substance abuse treatment program; (iii) has completed a drug test administered by a laboratory or medical professional within 90 days prior to being approved, and such test returned with a negative result; and (iv) complies with any other obligations as determined by the Department.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in this section, a child-placing agency may approve as an adoptive or foster parent an applicant convicted of any offense set forth in clause (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

who has had his civil rights restored by the Governor or other appropriate authority, provided that 20 years have elapsed following the conviction.

If an applicant is denied licensure, registration or approval because of information from the central registry or convictions appearing on his criminal history record, the Commissioner shall provide a copy of the information obtained from the central registry or the Central Criminal Records Exchange or both to the applicant.

Further dissemination of the background check information is prohibited other than to the Commissioner’s representative or a federal or state authority or court as may be required to comply with an express requirement of law for such further dissemination.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-235, 63-236; 1968, cc. 578, 585, §§ 63.1-198, 63.1-199; 1975, c. 439; 1985, c. 360, § 63.1-198.1; 1986, cc. 300, 627; 1987, cc. 130, 131, 692, 693; 1992, c. 746; 1993, cc. 730, 742; 1995, c. 401; 1996, c. 747; 1997, c. 427; 1998, cc. 551, 581; 1999, c. 740; 2001, c. 778; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 714; 2005, cc. 610, 722, 924; 2006, c. 885; 2014, c. 129; 2015, cc. 364, 758, 770; 2017, cc. 189, 751, 809; 2018, cc. 369, 573; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Cross references.

As to compliance by child day care centers operated by religious institutions that are exempt from licensure with the requirements of §

63.2-1724

relating to background checks, see §

63.2-1716

.

As to records check for employees or volunteers of a child day center or family day home that has not met the requirements of §§

63.2-1720

,

63.2-1721

, and

63.2-1724

and that applies to enter into a contract with a local department of social services, see § 63.2-1725.

As to punishment for Class 1 and 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

. As to national criminal background checks by businesses and organizations regarding employees or volunteers providing care to children, the elderly and disabled, see §

19.2-392.02

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

Acts 2006, c. 744, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act for the period of July 1, 2006, through July 30, 2008, and passed during the 2007 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor. If such funds are appropriated, then the provisions of this act shall become affective July 1, 2007.” The funding was not provided and the amendments to this section by Acts 2006, c. 744, never took effect.

Acts 2015, cc. 758 and 770, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of §§

63.2-1720

and

63.2-1721

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and of §§

63.2-1720.1

and

63.2-1721.1

, as created by this act, shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278, provided for a July 1, 2020, expiration date for the 2017 amendments. Acts 2020, cc. 462 and 463, cl. 1 and 2, repealed Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278.

Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278 provides: “Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278, provided for expiration of the 2017 amendments upon repeal of certain provisions of the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 2014 establishing requirements for national fingerprint-based criminal history background checks for employees and applicants. Acts 2020, cc. 462 and 463, cl. 1 and 2, repealed Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2018, cc. 146 and 278.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 714 substituted “an exception in subsections E or F” for “the exception in subsection E” in subsection C; substituted “10” for “ten” in subsection E; added present subsection F and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 610 and 924 are nearly identical, and inserted the second sentence in subsection A; in subsection C, inserted clause (ii) and redesignated former clauses (ii) and (iii) as clauses (iii) and (iv).
Acts 2005, c. 924, also inserts “In the case of child welfare agencies or adoptive or foster parents” in subdivision B 3.

The 2005 amendment by c. 722 inserts “as child welfare agency” in the section catchline; in subsection E, inserted “or foster” preceding “parent” and substituted “moral turpitude, or a minor” for “or moral turpitude.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 885 substituted “subsections E, F, or G” for “subsections E or F” preceding clause (i) near the end of subsection C; added subsection G; and redesignated former subsections G through I as subsections H through J.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 129, rewrote subsection D, which formerly read “No person specified in subsection A shall be involved in the day-to-day operations of the child welfare agency or shall be alone with, in control of, or supervising one or more of the children without first having completed background checks pursuant to subsection B.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 364 substituted “G, or H” for “or G” in subsection C; added subsection H; redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 758 and 770, effective July 1, 2017, are identical,
and rewrote subsections A through D; deleted former subsection J, which read: “The provisions of this section referring to a sworn statement or affirmation and to prohibitions on the issuance of a license for any offense shall not apply to any children’s residential facility licensed pursuant to §

63.2-1701

, which instead shall comply with the background investigation requirements contained in §

63.2-1726

.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 189 and 751 are identical, and rewrote subsection A; in subdivision B 3, deleted “family day systems, and family day homes” following “independent foster homes”; in subsection C, deleted “registration” following “issuance of a license,” “or family day system or a registration to a family day home;” following “independent foster home” and “or (iv) a family day system shall not approve a family day home” following “or foster home”; in subsection D, deleted “or family day system or a registered family day home” or similar language, twice; and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809 rewrote subsections C, and E through H.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 369 and 573 are identical, and added “or eight years have elapsed following the conviction and the applicant (i) has complied with all obligations imposed by the criminal court; (ii) has completed a substance abuse treatment program; (iii) has completed a drug test administered by a laboratory or medical professional within 90 days prior to being approved, and such test returned with a negative result; and (iv) complies with any other obligations as determined by the Department” in subsection G.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection A, in the first sentence, deleted “or family day system or registration as a family day home” following “independent foster home” in the introductory wording, deleted “family day system, or family day home” in clause (ii) following “independent foster home” and deleted “and (iii) any other adult living in the home of an applicant for registration as a family day home” following “one or more of the children,” and in the last sentence, deleted “child-placing agencies and operators of family day homes requesting approval by family day systems, and any other adult residing in the family day home or existing employee or volunteer of the family day home,” following “child-placing agencies”; in subdivision B 3, deleted “family day systems, and family day homes” following “independent foster homes”; in subsection C, penultimate sentence, deleted “or family day system or a registration to a family day home” following “independent foster home” and deleted “or (c) a family day system shall not approve a family day home” at the end; in subsection D, deleted “or family day system or a registered family day home” twice following “independent foster home” and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

§ 63.2-1721.1.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to background check upon application for licensure, registration, or approval as child day center, family day home, or family day system; penalty, see § 22.1-289.036.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 860 and
861, effective July 1, 2021, repealed various sections in this chapter and recodified them. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendments by Acts
2020, c. 936 have also been given effect in
§ 22.1-289.036, effective July 1, 2021.

Former §

63.2-1721.1

, pertaining to background check upon application for licensure, registration, or approval as child day center, family day home, or family day system; penalty, derived from
2015, cc. 758,
770;
2017, cc. 189,
751,
809;
2019, c. 447;
2020, c. 936.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 447, effective July 1, 2020, in the last paragraph of subsection B, inserted “by the Department or its designee or, in the case of a child day program operated by a local government, may be forwarded by the local law-enforcement agency”; and in subsection I, inserted “or the local law-enforcement agency.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 936 added subdivision B 4 and subsection J and made stylistic changes.